Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1327
Judicial sale;
sheriff as master commissioner.

A sheriff may act as a master commissioner under subdivision
(1)(b) of section 25-1326. Sales made under such
subdivision shall conform in all respects to the laws regulating
sales of land upon execution.

R.S.1867, Code § 452, p. 468;

R.S.1913, § 8020;

C.S.1922, § 8961;

C.S.1929, § 20-1327;

R.S.1943, § 25-1327;

Laws 2010, LB732, § 2.

Officer cannot be compelled to advertise sale in any particular newspaper. State ex rel. Elliott v. Holliday, 35 Neb. 327, 53 N.W. 142 (1892).